New Jersey, session 222, S1103.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An employer subject to the provisions of P.L.2007, c.114 (C.34:20-1 et seq.) shall conspicuously post notification, in a place or places accessible to all individuals working in each of the employer's workplaces, in a form issued by regulation adopted by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, of the  rights of employees to unemployment benefits, minimum wage, overtime and other federal and State workplace protections, including the protections against retaliation and the penalties pursuant to P.L.2007, c.114 (C.34:20-1 et seq.).  The employer shall provide each individual working for the employer with a written copy of the notification: (1) not later than 30 days after the form of the notification is issued by the commissioner; (2) at the time of the individual's hiring, if the individual is hired after the issuance; and (3) at any time, upon the first request of the individual. b.    The notification shall also provide information on how an individual or an individual's authorized representative, may contact, by telephone, mail and e-mail, a representative of the commissioner to provide information to, or file a complaint with, the commissioners representative regarding the provisions and possible violations of P.L.2007, c.114 (C.34:20-1 et seq.). c.     The commissioner shall make the notification required by this section available in English, Spanish, and any other language that the commissioner determines is the first language of a significant number of workers in the State. This determination shall be, at the discretion of the commissioner, based on the numerical percentages of all workers in the State for whom English or Spanish is not a first language or in a manner consistent with any regulations promulgated by the commissioner for this purpose. The employer shall post and provide the notification in English, Spanish, and any other language for which the commissioner has made the notification available and which the employer reasonably believes is the first language of a significant number of the employer's workforce. d.    An employer who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense and shall, upon conviction, be subject to a civil penalty of up to $1,500 for a first violation, and up to $5,000 for any subsequent violation within a five year period. e.     Any sum collected as a penalty pursuant to this section shall be applied toward enforcement and administration costs of the Division of Wage and Hour Compliance in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.